Utah statutes.
19-3-308.   Application fee and annual fees.

(1) (a)  Any application for a waste transfer, storage, decay in storage, treatment, or disposal facility shall be accompanied by an initial fee of $5,000,000.

(b)  The applicant shall subsequently pay an additional fee to cover the costs to the state associated with review of the application, including costs to the state and the state's contractors for permitting, technical, administrative, legal, safety, and emergency response reviews, planning, training, infrastructure, and other impact analyses, studies, and services required to evaluate a proposed facility.

(2)  For the purpose of funding the state oversight and inspection of any waste transfer, storage, decay in storage, treatment, or disposal facility, and to establish state infrastructure, including providing for state Department of Environmental Quality, state Department of Transportation, state Department of Public Safety, and other state agencies' technical, administrative, legal, infrastructure, maintenance, training, safety, socio-economic, law enforcement, and emergency resources necessary to respond to these facilities, the owner or operator shall pay to the state a fee as established by department rule under Section 63J-1-504, to be assessed:

(a)  per ton of storage cask and high-level nuclear waste per year for storage, decay in storage, treatment, or disposal of high-level nuclear waste;

(b)  per ton of transportation cask and high-level nuclear waste for each transfer of high-level nuclear waste;

(c)  per ton of storage cask and greater than class C radioactive waste for the storage, decay in storage, treatment, or disposal of greater than class C radioactive waste; and

(d)  per ton of transportation cask and greater than class C radioactive waste for each transfer of greater than class C radioactive waste.

(3)  Funds collected under Subsection (2) shall be placed in the Nuclear Accident and Hazard Compensation Account, created in Subsection 19-3-309(3).

(4)  The owner or operator of the facility shall pay the fees imposed under this section to the department on or before the 15th day of the month following the month in which the fee accrued.

(5)  Annual fees due under this part accrue on July 1 of each year and shall be paid to the department by July 15 of that year.

